Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1414
Compensation, defined.

Compensation shall mean anything of monetary value received or to be received from a person, whether in the form of a fee, salary, forbearance, forgiveness, or any other form of recompense.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 14.